Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
Determination of Liability — Putative Holder Remedies

393A.660.
Informal conference.

Not later than thirty (30) days after receipt of a notice under KRS

393A.560

, the putative holder may request an informal conference with the administrator to review the determination. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the administrator may designate an employee to act on behalf of the administrator.

If a putative holder makes a timely request under subsection (1) of this section for an informal conference:

Not later than twenty (20) days after the date of the request, the administrator shall set the time and place of the conference;

The administrator shall give the putative holder notice in a record of the time and place of the conference;

The conference may be held in person, by telephone, or by electronic means, as determined by the administrator;

The request tolls the ninety (90) day period under KRS

393A.680

and

393A.690

until notice of a decision under paragraph (g) of this subsection has been given to the putative holder or the putative holder withdraws the request for the conference;

The conference may be postponed, adjourned, and reconvened as the administrator determines appropriate;

The administrator or administrator’s designee with the approval of the administrator may modify a determination made under KRS

393A.650

or withdraw it; and

The administrator shall issue a decision in a record and provide a copy of the record to the putative holder and examiner not later than twenty (20) days after the conference ends.

A conference under subsection (2) of this section shall not be an administrative remedy and shall not be a contested case subject to KRS Chapter 13B. An oath shall not be required and rules of evidence shall not apply in the conference.

At a conference under subsection (2) of this section, the putative holder shall be given an opportunity to confer informally with the administrator and the person that examined the records of the putative holder to:

Discuss the determination made under KRS

393A.650

; and

Present any issue concerning the validity of the determination.

If the administrator fails to act within the period prescribed in subsection (2)(a) or (g) of this section, the failure shall not affect a right of the administrator, except that interest shall not accrue on the amount for which the putative holder was determined to be liable under KRS

393A.650

during the period in which the administrator failed to act until the earlier of:

The date under KRS

393A.680

the putative holder initiates administrative review or files an action under KRS

393A.690

; or

Ninety (90) days after the putative holder received notice of the administrator’s determination under KRS

393A.680

if no review was initiated under KRS 393A.680 and no action was filed under KRS

393A.690

.

The administrator may hold an informal conference with a putative holder about a determination under KRS

393A.650

without a request at any time before the putative holder initiates administrative review under KRS

393A.680

or files an action under KRS

393A.690

.

Interest and penalties under KRS

393A.730

continue to accrue on property not reported, paid, or delivered as required by this chapter after the initiation, and during the pendency, of an informal conference under this section.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 66, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.670.
Review of administrator’s determination.

A putative holder may seek relief from a determination under KRS

393A.650

by:

Administrative review under KRS

393A.680

; or

Judicial review under KRS

393A.690

.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 67, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.680.
Administrative review.

Not later than ninety (90) days after receiving notice of the administrator’s determination under KRS

393A.650

, a putative holder may initiate a proceeding under KRS Chapter 13B for review of the administrator’s determination.

A final decision in an administrative proceeding initiated under subsection (1) of this section shall be subject to judicial review under KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 68, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.690.
Judicial remedy.

Not later than ninety (90) days after receiving notice of the administrator’s determination under KRS

393A.650

, the putative holder may:

File an action against the administrator in the appropriate court challenging the administrator’s determination of liability and seeking a declaration that the determination is unenforceable, in whole or in part; or

Pay the amount or deliver the property determined by the administrator to be paid or delivered to the administrator and, not later than six (6) months after payment or delivery, file an action against the administrator in the appropriate court for a refund of all or part of the amount paid or return of all or part of the property delivered.

If a putative holder pays or delivers property the administrator determined shall be paid or delivered to the administrator at any time after the putative holder files an action under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the court shall continue the action as if it had been filed originally as an action for a refund or return of property under subsection (1)(b) of this section.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 69, effective July 14, 2018.